Colorado, session 2026A, HB1424.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) Coloradans increasingly rely on a range of transportation modes,
including transportation network companies, to travel to work, school,
medical appointments, social gatherings, and more;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) Large transportation network companies like Uber and Lyft
operate through digital platforms they control that connect riders and
drivers;
(c) Transportation network companies are widely used by a broad
range of individuals, including vulnerable populations such as individuals
with disabilities and individuals seeking alternative transportation after
consuming alcohol. Reports from drivers and riders have identified safety
concerns, including incidents involving fraud, sexual assault, and other
harms.
(d) According to the New York Times, between 2017 and 2022, a
total of 400,181 Uber trips resulted in reports of sexual assault and sexual
misconduct in the United States. Previously, the company had only
disclosed 12,522 accounts of serious sexual assaults for the same time
period, without indicating the total number of sexual assault and sexual
misconduct reports the company received. The New York Times report
means that Uber received a report of sexual assault or sexual misconduct in
the United States almost every eight minutes, a far more pervasive problem
than what the company originally disclosed.
(e) The structure and scale of transportation network company
operations present ongoing considerations regarding safety practices,
accountability, and the allocation of resources for rider and driver
protections.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that the people of
Colorado will benefit from legislation to support clear and consistent safety
standards for transportation network companies and to promote a
transportation system that is safe, reliable, and accessible.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-10.1-602, amend
(1) and (2.6); and add (1.1), (1.2), (1.3), (1.4), (1.5), (1.6), (1.7), (1.9),
(2.7), and (7) as follows:
40-10.1-602. Definitions.
As used in this part 6, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Personal vehicle" means a vehicle that is used by a
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

transportation network company driver in connection with providing
services for a transportation network company that meets the vehicle criteria
set forth in this part 6. "ACCOUNT RENTING" MEANS:
(a) A PERSON THAT HAS AN AUTHORIZED PROFILE TO DRIVE FOR A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY ALLOWING ANOTHER PERSON TO
DRIVE FOR THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY UNDER THE
AUTHORIZED PROFILE IN EXCHANGE FOR COMPENSATION; OR
(b) A PERSON COMPENSATING ANOTHER PERSON FOR USE OF THE
COMPENSATED PERSON'S AUTHORIZED PROFILE TO ACCEPT A PREARRANGED
RIDE FOR A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY.
(1.1) "ACCOUNT SHARING" MEANS:
(a) A PERSON THAT HAS AN AUTHORIZED PROFILE TO DRIVE FOR A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY ALLOWING ANOTHER PERSON TO
DRIVE FOR THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY UNDER THE
AUTHORIZED PROFILE; OR
(b) A PERSON USING ANOTHER PERSON'S AUTHORIZED PROFILE TO
ACCEPT A PREARRANGED RIDE FOR A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY.
(1.2) (a) "BIOMETRIC DATA" MEANS ONE OR MORE BIOMETRIC
IDENTIFIERS THAT ARE USED OR INTENDED TO BE USED, SINGLY OR IN
COMBINATION WITH EACH OTHER OR WITH OTHER PERSONAL DATA, FOR
IDENTIFICATION PURPOSES.
(b) "BIOMETRIC DATA" DOES NOT INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING UNLESS
THE BIOMETRIC DATA IS USED FOR IDENTIFICATION PURPOSES:
(I) A DIGITAL OR PHYSICAL PHOTOGRAPH;
(II) AN AUDIO OR VOICE RECORDING; OR
(III) ANY DATA GENERATED FROM A DIGITAL OR PHYSICAL
PHOTOGRAPH OR AN AUDIO OR VIDEO RECORDING.
(1.3) "BIOMETRIC IDENTIFIER" MEANS DATA GENERATED BY THE
TECHNOLOGICAL PROCESSING, MEASUREMENT, OR ANALYSIS OF A
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

CONSUMER'S BIOLOGICAL, PHYSICAL, OR BEHAVIORAL CHARACTERISTICS,
WHICH DATA CAN BE PROCESSED FOR THE PURPOSE OF UNIQUELY
IDENTIFYING AN INDIVIDUAL. "BIOMETRIC IDENTIFIER" INCLUDES:
(a) A FINGERPRINT;
(b) A VOICEPRINT;
(c) A SCAN OR RECORD OF AN EYE RETINA OR IRIS;
(d) A FACIAL MAP, FACIAL GEOMETRY, OR FACIAL TEMPLATE; OR
(e) OTHER UNIQUE BIOLOGICAL, PHYSICAL, OR BEHAVIORAL
PATTERNS OR CHARACTERISTICS.
(1.4) "CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK" MEANS A BACKGROUND
CHECK PERFORMED USING COUNTY, STATE, AND NATIONAL CRIMINAL
BACKGROUND DATABASES OR OTHER SIMILAR COMMERCIAL DATABASES AND
VALIDATED THROUGH A PRIMARY SOURCE SEARCH. THE BACKGROUND
CHECK MUST INCLUDE A SEARCH OF THE NATIONAL SEX OFFENDER PUBLIC
WEBSITE OPERATED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE AND,
IN JURISDICTIONS WHERE AN APPLICANT HAS LIVED, A FEDERAL DISTRICT
COURT RECORDS SEARCH, A COUNTY CRIMINAL RECORDS SEARCH, AND A
MOTOR VEHICLE RECORDS SEARCH.
(1.5) "IMPOSTER DRIVER" MEANS A PERSON WHO IMPERSONATES A
DRIVER THROUGH ACCOUNT SHARING OR ACCOUNT RENTING; BY DISPLAYING
A SIGN, BRANDING, OR OTHER SYMBOLS IN A PERSONAL VEHICLE
REPRESENTING A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY; OR BY OTHER
MEANS.
(1.6) "LARGE-SCALE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY" MEANS
A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY WITH AT LEAST TWENTY
THOUSAND RIDES OCCURRING MONTHLY ON THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY'S DIGITAL NETWORK.
(1.7) "MINOR" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD.
(1.9) "PERSONAL VEHICLE" MEANS A VEHICLE THAT IS USED BY A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY DRIVER IN CONNECTION WITH
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

PROVIDING SERVICES FOR A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY AND
THAT MEETS THE VEHICLE CRITERIA SET FORTH IN THIS PART 6.
(2.6) "Student" means an individual enrolled in a school
"SMALL-SCALE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY" MEANS A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY WITH FEWER THAN TWENTY
THOUSAND RIDES OCCURRING MONTHLY ON THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY'S DIGITAL NETWORK.
(2.7) "STUDENT" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL ENROLLED IN A SCHOOL.
(7) "YOUTH" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER FIFTEEN YEARS OF AGE.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-10.1-605, amend
(3)(b), (3)(c)(I), (3)(c)(II), and (5); and add (3)(b.5), (3)(b.7), (3)(c)(V),
(3)(c)(VI), (3)(d), (3)(e), (7.3), (7.5), (7.7), (7.8), and (12) as follows:
40-10.1-605. Operational requirements - criminal history record
check - driver verification - audio and video recording - deactivation -
food or beverages - reviews and ratings - rules.
(3) (b) A driver TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY shall obtain
a PRIVATELY ADMINISTERED criminal history record check in accordance
with subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) OF EACH
INDIVIDUAL SERVING AS A DRIVER THROUGH USE OF THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY'S DIGITAL NETWORK every five years SIX MONTHS while
serving THE INDIVIDUAL SERVES as a driver.
(b.5) A LARGE-SCALE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL
PAY THE COSTS OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK CONDUCTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3).
(b.7) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL SHARE THE
RESULTS OF EACH CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK CONDUCTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION WITH THE DRIVER WHO IS THE SUBJECT OF THE
BACKGROUND CHECK.
(c) (I) A person AN INDIVIDUAL who has been convicted of or pled
guilty or nolo contendere to driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol
in the previous seven years before applying to become a driver shall not
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

serve as a driver. If the criminal history record check PERFORMED PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (3)(a) OR (3)(b) OF THIS SECTION reveals that the person
INDIVIDUAL has ever been convicted of or pled guilty or nolo contendere to
any of the following felony offenses, the person INDIVIDUAL shall not serve
as a driver:
(A) An A FELONY offense involving fraud, as described in article 5
of title 18; C.R.S.;
(B) An offense involving unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in
section 16-22-102 (9); C.R.S.;
(C) An A FELONY offense against property, as described in article
4 of title 18; C.R.S.; or
(D) A FELONY crime of violence, as described DEFINED in section
18-1.3-406, C.R.S. 18-1.3-406 (2);
(E) A FELONY OFFENSE INVOLVING DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, AS DEFINED
IN SECTION 18-6-800.3 (1);
(F) A FELONY OFFENSE INVOLVING STALKING, AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 18-3-602;
(G) A FELONY OFFENSE INVOLVING MENACING, AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 18-3-206;
(H) INDECENT EXPOSURE, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-7-302; OR
(I) PUBLIC INDECENCY, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-7-301.
(II) A person AN INDIVIDUAL who has been convicted of OR PLED
GUILTY OR NOLO CONTENDERE TO a comparable offense to the offenses
listed in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) SUBSECTION (3)(c)(I) OF THIS
SECTION in another state or in the United States shall not serve as a driver.
(V) AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL NOT SERVE AS A DRIVER FOR A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS CONFIRMED BY
A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY OR THE COMMISSION TO HAVE BEEN
DISQUALIFIED OR REMOVED FROM DRIVING FOR A TRANSPORTATION SERVICE
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

REGULATED UNDER THIS TITLE 40 OR DISQUALIFIED OR REMOVED FROM
DRIVING UNDER A SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR LAW OF ANOTHER STATE FOR AN
INCIDENT INVOLVING ANY OF THE FOLLOWING ACTIVITIES:
(A) A FELONY OFFENSE INVOLVING FRAUD, AS DESCRIBED IN ARTICLE
5 OF TITLE 18;
(B) AN OFFENSE INVOLVING UNLAWFUL SEXUAL BEHAVIOR, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 16-22-102 (9);
(C) A FELONY OFFENSE AGAINST PROPERTY, AS DESCRIBED IN
ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 18;
(D) A FELONY CRIME OF VIOLENCE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
18-1.3-406 (2);
(E) A FELONY OFFENSE INVOLVING DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, AS DEFINED
IN SECTION 18-6-800.3 (1);
(F) A FELONY OFFENSE INVOLVING STALKING, AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 18-3-602;
(G) A FELONY OFFENSE INVOLVING MENACING, AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 18-3-206;
(H) INDECENT EXPOSURE, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-7-302; OR
(I) PUBLIC INDECENCY, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-7-301.
(VI) IF A PERSON FILES A COMPLAINT WITH A TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY OR THE COMMISSION REGARDING THE ALLEGATIONS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 8-4-127 (3)(b)(V) AGAINST A DRIVER THROUGH USE
OF THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY'S DIGITAL NETWORK, THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL PROCURE AND PAY FOR A
PRIVATELY ADMINISTERED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK FOR THE
DRIVER AND INITIATE A REVIEW OF THE DRIVER FOR DEACTIVATION AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 8-4-127 (3)(b)(V).
(d) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028, THE COMMISSION SHALL CREATE A
PROCESS BY RULE FOR SHARING INFORMATION, BOTH PUNITIVE AND
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

EXONERATIVE, BETWEEN TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANIES
REGARDING THE DEACTIVATION OF DRIVERS.
(e) (I) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL CONDUCT AN
INTERNAL DEACTIVATION RECONSIDERATION OF A CHALLENGED
DEACTIVATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 8-4-127 (5)(b).
(II) THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY'S RESOLUTION OF A
DRIVER'S CHALLENGE TO A DEACTIVATION MUST INCLUDE THE OPTION FOR
THE PARTY THAT FILED A COMPLAINT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(c)(VI)
OF THIS SECTION TO OPT IN TO RECEIVE UPDATES THAT THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SENDS THROUGH THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY'S DIGITAL PLATFORM AND VIA EMAIL
DETAILING THE DISPOSITION OF THE DRIVER'S CHALLENGE.
(5) (a) If any A person files a complaint with the commission against
a transportation network company or driver, the commission may inspect
the transportation network company's records as reasonably necessary to
investigate and resolve the complaint PERFORM THE COMMISSION'S
REGULATORY FUNCTIONS.
(b) IF A PERSON FILES A COMPLAINT AGAINST A TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY OR DRIVER, THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY
SHALL RESPOND TO A SUBPOENA OR SEARCH WARRANT FOR INFORMATION
RELATED TO THE COMPLAINT FROM A COURT, THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL, A DISTRICT ATTORNEY'S OFFICE, THE COMMISSION, OR A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY NO LATER THAN SEVENTY-TWO HOURS AFTER THE
REQUEST IS MADE, UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED UPON BY THE SUBPOENAING
PARTY.
(7.3) (a) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE
REGULAR SAFETY TRAINING TO EACH DRIVER AND EACH RIDER.
(b) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT
RULES ESTABLISHING REQUIREMENTS AND PROCEDURES FOR DRIVER AND
RIDER SAFETY TRAINING CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7.3)(a) OF
THIS SECTION, INCLUDING THE REQUIRED FREQUENCY OF TRAINING.
(7.5) (a) A LARGE-SCALE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY
SHALL NOT CHARGE A FEE OR INCREASE THE COST OF A PREARRANGED RIDE
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

FOR A RIDER SOLELY ON THE BASIS OF THE RIDER OPTING IN TO AUDIO AND
VIDEO RECORDING OF A PREARRANGED RIDE.
(b) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT
RULES FOR LARGE-SCALE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANIES:
(I) ESTABLISHING REQUIREMENTS AND PROCEDURES FOR AUDIO AND
VIDEO RECORDING OF EACH PREARRANGED RIDE, INCLUDING RULES
REGARDING:
(A) THE DEADLINES FOR IMPLEMENTATION OF AUDIO AND VIDEO
RECORDING;
(B) THE ABILITY FOR DRIVERS TO OPT IN TO AUDIO AND VIDEO
RECORDING FOR EACH PREARRANGED RIDE AND THE CADENCE FOR
AUTOMATICALLY OPTING IN DRIVERS;
(C) THE ABILITY FOR RIDERS TO OPT IN TO AUDIO AND VIDEO
RECORDING FOR EACH PREARRANGED RIDE;
(D) ON-DEVICE RECORDING DELETION CAPABILITIES AND
RESTRICTIONS;
(E) ACCESS TO, OWNERSHIP OF, STORAGE OF, ENCRYPTION OF, AND
RETENTION PERIODS FOR AUDIO AND VIDEO RECORDINGS, CONSIDERING THE
CAPABILITIES AND LIMITATIONS OF IN-USE TECHNOLOGY AND INCLUDING
MEASURES TO PROMOTE VICTIM-SURVIVOR PRIVACY AND CHOICE;
(F) NOTIFICATIONS TO DRIVERS AND RIDERS OF AUDIO AND VIDEO
RECORDING AND INFORMATION REGARDING HOW TO REJECT A TRIP;
(G) INTEGRATION OF AUDIO AND VIDEO RECORDING INTO A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY'S DIGITAL PLATFORM; AND
(H) PROHIBITIONS ON CHARGING A FEE OR INCREASING THE COST OF
A PREARRANGED RIDE FOR A RIDER SOLELY ON THE BASIS OF THE RIDER
OPTING IN TO AUDIO AND VIDEO RECORDING;
(II) GOVERNING TECHNOLOGY FAILURES RELATED TO AUDIO AND
VIDEO RECORDING OF EACH PREARRANGED RIDE, INCLUDING RULES THAT
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

HOLD HARMLESS A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY FOR A
TECHNOLOGICAL FAILURE OUTSIDE OF THE CONTROL OF THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY IF THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY IS OTHERWISE ACTING IN GOOD FAITH TO CONDUCT AUDIO AND
VIDEO RECORDING OF A PREARRANGED RIDE;
(III) DETERMINING IF AND WHEN A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY SHALL REIMBURSE A DRIVER FOR TECHNOLOGY TO ENABLE AUDIO
AND VIDEO RECORDING OF A PREARRANGED RIDE; AND
(IV) ESTABLISHING APPROPRIATE TIMELINES FOR LARGE-SCALE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANIES TO COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION AND
RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(c) (I) UNTIL THE COMMISSION ADOPTS RULES PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (7.5)(b) OF THIS SECTION, A LARGE-SCALE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY SHALL:
(A) MAKE BEST EFFORTS TO OBTAIN ALL AUDIO AND VIDEO
RECORDINGS FROM A DRIVER'S OR RIDER'S DEVICE RELATED TO A REPORTED
SAFETY INCIDENT DURING A PREARRANGED RIDE AND RETAIN THE
RECORDING FOR AT LEAST THIRTY DAYS AFTER RECEIPT UNLESS OTHERWISE
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION BY RULE;
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (7.5)(c)(I) OF THIS SECTION, IF
A PERSON FILES A COMPLAINT AGAINST A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY WITH THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY OR THE
COMMISSION AND THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY RECEIVES
NOTICE OF THE COMPLAINT WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE PREARRANGED
RIDE, UNLESS OTHERWISE DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION BY RULE, OR A
PREARRANGED RIDE IS THE SUBJECT OF AN ACTIVE LAW ENFORCEMENT
INVESTIGATION AND THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY RECEIVES
NOTICE OF THE INVESTIGATION WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE
PREARRANGED RIDE, THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL
RETAIN ANY RECEIVED AUDIO AND VIDEO RECORDINGS RELATED TO THE
COMPLAINT OR INVESTIGATION FOR ONE YEAR AFTER THE PREARRANGED
RIDE OR UNTIL THE INVESTIGATION IS COMPLETED, WHICHEVER IS LONGER.
(II) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY MAY RETAIN
SAFETY-RELATED AUDIO AND VIDEO RECORDINGS FOR AS LONG AS
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

NECESSARY TO ADDRESS POTENTIAL LITIGATION REQUIREMENTS.
(d) (I) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT
RULES ESTABLISHING REQUIREMENTS AND PROCEDURES FOR AUDIO AND
VIDEO RECORDING FOR SMALL-SCALE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANIES, INCLUDING RULES REGARDING:
(A) THE ABILITY FOR DRIVERS AND RIDERS TO OPT IN TO AUDIO AND
VIDEO RECORDING, CONSIDERING THE CAPABILITIES, RESOURCES, AND
UNIQUE BUSINESS MODEL OF SMALL-SCALE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANIES AND IMPACTS TO DRIVERS' CANCELLATION RATE METRICS;
(B) ACCESS TO, OWNERSHIP OF, STORAGE OF, ENCRYPTION OF, AND
RETENTION PERIODS FOR AUDIO AND VIDEO RECORDINGS;
(C) NOTIFICATIONS TO DRIVERS AND RIDERS OF AUDIO AND VIDEO
RECORDING AND INFORMATION REGARDING HOW TO REJECT A TRIP; AND
(D) ESTABLISHING APPROPRIATE TIMELINES FOR SMALL-SCALE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANIES TO COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION AND
RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(II) RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (7.5)(d) DO NOT
APPLY TO A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY THAT IS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (12) OF THIS SECTION.
(7.7) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL MAINTAIN
CLEAR POLICIES PROHIBITING DRIVERS OR RIDERS FROM OFFERING, SELLING,
OR PROVIDING FOOD OR BEVERAGES TO ANOTHER DRIVER OR RIDER UNLESS:
(a) THE FOOD OR BEVERAGES ARE FACTORY-SEALED;
(b) A RIDER IS OFFERING FOOD OR BEVERAGES TO ANOTHER RIDER
WHO IS IN THE SAME PARTY; OR
(c) THE FOOD OR BEVERAGES ARE NECESSARY DUE TO AN
EMERGENCY.
(7.8) (a) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY THAT MAINTAINS
A RATING SYSTEM SHALL NOT:
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

(I) ALTER THE RATING A RIDER ASSIGNED A DRIVER OR THE RATING
A DRIVER ASSIGNED A RIDER ON THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY'S DIGITAL PLATFORM;
(II) ASSIGN AN AUTOMATIC OR DEFAULT DRIVER RATING THAT THE
RIDER DID NOT ASSIGN; OR
(III) ASSIGN AN AUTOMATIC OR DEFAULT RIDER RATING THAT THE
DRIVER DID NOT ASSIGN.
(b) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY MAY DELETE RATINGS
OR REVIEWS THAT ARE PLAUSIBLY MOTIVATED BY FRAUD OR BIAS. A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL NOT CONSIDER NEGATIVE
RATINGS OR REVIEWS THAT ARE MOTIVATED BY FRAUD OR BIAS IN A REVIEW
OF A DRIVER FOR DEACTIVATION CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(3)(c)(VI) OF THIS SECTION OR AN INTERNAL DEACTIVATION
RECONSIDERATION CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(e) OF THIS
SECTION OR SECTION 8-4-127 (5).
(12) SUBSECTIONS (3)(e), (7.5), (7.7), AND (7.8) OF THIS SECTION DO
NOT APPLY TO A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY THAT:
(a) EITHER SERVES RIDERS, AT LEAST SEVENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF
WHOM ARE MINORS, OR EARNS AT LEAST NINETY PERCENT OF THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY'S REVENUE FROM CONTRACTS WITH
A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE SCHOOL, THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, OR
AN AGENCY OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OR
OF THE STATE; AND
(b) HAS AT LEAST NINETY PERCENT OF THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY'S DRIVERS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE COMMISSION'S
RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 40-10.1-608 (3)(a).
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-10.1-609, add (3)
and (4) as follows:
40-10.1-609. Reporting requirements - report - crash registry -
rules.
(3) (a) ON OR BEFORE FEBRUARY 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

FEBRUARY 1 EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT THAT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING DATA
TO THE COMMISSION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, AND EACH MEMBER OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY:
(I) THE NUMBER OF REPORTED SAFETY INCIDENTS INVOLVING A
DRIVER WHO PROVIDED SERVICES FOR OR A RIDER WHO RECEIVED SERVICES
FROM THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY IN THE PRECEDING
CALENDAR YEAR. THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE THE NUMBER OF REPORTED
INSTANCES OF:
(A) PHYSICAL ASSAULT;
(B) SEXUAL ASSAULT;
(C) VERBAL THREATS;
(D) STALKING;
(E) HARASSMENT;
(F) THEFT;
(G) A MOTOR VEHICLE CRASH;
(H) HOMICIDE; OR
(I) A MOTOR VEHICLE CRASH THAT RESULTED IN MORE THAN FIVE
THOUSAND DOLLARS OF DAMAGE TO PROPERTY;
(II) THE NUMBER OF REPORTED INCIDENTS OF DISCRIMINATORY
SPEECH OR DISCRIMINATORY CONDUCT INVOLVING A DRIVER WHO PROVIDED
SERVICES FOR OR A RIDER WHO RECEIVED SERVICES FROM THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY;
(III) ALL REPORTS OF SAFETY-RELATED INCIDENTS MADE TO OR
CREATED BY THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY IN THE PRECEDING
CALENDAR YEAR. THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL
REDACT ALL PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION OF A DRIVER OR RIDER
IN A REPORT SUBMITTED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3)(a)(III).
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

(IV) THE NUMBER OF MOTOR VEHICLE CRASHES INVOLVING A
PREARRANGED RIDE THAT RESULTED IN BODILY INJURY TO AN INDIVIDUAL.
(b) THE COMMISSION SHALL MAKE THE REPORTS SUBMITTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3) AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC.
(c) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL MAINTAIN A
REGISTRY OF CRASHES REQUIRED TO BE REPORTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (3)(a)(IV) OF THIS SECTION FOR A PERIOD OF THREE YEARS
AFTER THE CRASH OCCURS. THE REGISTRY MUST CONTAIN THE DATE OF THE
CRASH; THE CITY AND STATE WHERE THE CRASH OCCURRED; THE DRIVER'S
NAME; WHETHER THERE WERE ANY, AND, IF SO, THE NUMBER OF, INJURIES OR
FATALITIES; AND ANY POLICE REPORT NUMBER ASSOCIATED WITH THE
CRASH.
(d) NO LATER THAN THIRTY DAYS AFTER A CRASH REQUIRED TO BE
REPORTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(a)(IV) OF THIS SECTION, A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL REPORT THE CRASH,
INCLUDING THE INFORMATION REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (3)(c) OF THIS
SECTION, TO THE COMMISSION.
(e) THE COMMISSION SHALL REVIEW THE REPORTS SUBMITTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3) FOR TRENDS IN INCIDENT TYPE OR
FREQUENCY.
(f) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT RULES TO IMPLEMENT AND
ENFORCE THIS SUBSECTION (3).
(4) SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY THAT:
(a) EITHER SERVES RIDERS, AT LEAST SEVENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF
WHOM ARE MINORS, OR EARNS AT LEAST NINETY PERCENT OF THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY'S REVENUE FROM CONTRACTS WITH
A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE SCHOOL, THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, OR
AN AGENCY OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OR
OF THE STATE; AND
(b) HAS AT LEAST NINETY PERCENT OF THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY'S DRIVERS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE COMMISSION'S
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 40-10.1-608 (3)(a).
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 40-10.1-610 as
follows:
40-10.1-610. Consumer protection - waiver of rights void -
biometric data and biometric identifiers - safety policies - training -
data retention - rules.
(1) (a) A PROVISION IN A CONTRACT BETWEEN A TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY AND A DRIVER OR RIDER IS VOID AS AGAINST PUBLIC
POLICY IF THE PROVISION:
(I) ATTEMPTS TO WAIVE OR WAIVES A RIGHT SPECIFIED IN THIS PART
6; OR
(II) ATTEMPTS TO WAIVE OR WAIVES A RIGHT TO BRING A CAUSE OF
ACTION PROVIDED BY THE "COLORADO CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT",
ARTICLE 1 OF TITLE 6, EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT THE WAIVER IS PREEMPTED BY
FEDERAL LAW.
(b) A PROVISION IN A CONTRACT BETWEEN A TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY AND A DRIVER OR RIDER MUST COMPLY WITH THE
FEDERAL "ENDING FORCED ARBITRATION OF SEXUAL ASSAULT AND SEXUAL
HARASSMENT ACT OF 2021", 9 U.S.C. SEC. 401 ET SEQ., AS AMENDED.
(c) TO THE EXTENT REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW, A PREDISPUTE
ARBITRATION AGREEMENT OR PREDISPUTE JOINT-ACTION WAIVER, AS THOSE
TERMS ARE DEFINED IN 9 U.S.C. SEC. 401, IS NOT ENFORCEABLE WITH
RESPECT TO A CLAIM THAT CONSTITUTES A SEXUAL ASSAULT DISPUTE OR A
SEXUAL HARASSMENT DISPUTE, AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN 9 U.S.C.
SEC. 401.
(2) (a) WITHIN THREE MONTHS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS
SECTION FOR A LARGE-SCALE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY AND
WITHIN SIX MONTHS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION FOR A
SMALL-SCALE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY, A TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY SHALL:
(I) DEVELOP AND ENFORCE A POLICY TO PREVENT IMPOSTER
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

DRIVERS, ACCOUNT SHARING, AND ACCOUNT RENTING;
(II) DEVELOP AND ENFORCE A POLICY TO PREVENT SEXUAL ASSAULT,
PHYSICAL ASSAULT, AND HOMICIDE AGAINST OR COMMITTED BY THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY'S DRIVERS;
(III) DEVELOP AND ENFORCE A POLICY PROHIBITING THE TRANSPORT
OF AN UNACCOMPANIED YOUTH UNLESS THE YOUTH IS PART OF A DULY
AUTHORIZED FAMILY ACCOUNT, IN WHICH A PARENT OR GUARDIAN MUST BE
PRESENT WHEN THE YOUTH ENTERS THE VEHICLE OR CONFIRMS
AUTHORIZATION FOR THE PREARRANGED RIDE;
(IV) EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED IN A POLICY DEVELOPED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2)(a)(III) OF THIS SECTION, DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A POLICY
THAT ALLOWS A DRIVER TO REFUSE A PREARRANGED RIDE TO AN INDIVIDUAL
WHOM THE DRIVER BELIEVES IS NOT AUTHORIZED TO USE THE ACCOUNT
REQUESTING THE PREARRANGED RIDE. THE POLICY MUST ENSURE THAT THE
DRIVER IS NOT PENALIZED BY THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY
FOR REFUSING A PREARRANGED RIDE TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHOM THE DRIVER
BELIEVES IS NOT AN AUTHORIZED RIDER ON THE ACCOUNT REQUESTING THE
PREARRANGED RIDE.
(V) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A POLICY ESTABLISHING PROCEDURES
FOR THE DEACTIVATION OF A DRIVER IF THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY IS NOTIFIED OF AN ALLEGATION AGAINST A DRIVER AS DESCRIBED
IN SECTION 40-10.1-605 (3)(c)(VI);
(VI) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A POLICY TO NOTIFY DRIVERS AND
RIDERS OF AND TRAIN DRIVERS AND RIDERS ABOUT ANY UPDATES TO
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SAFETY POLICIES;
(VII) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A POLICY TO PREVENT CRIMES
COMMITTED AGAINST DRIVERS BY RIDERS;
(VIII) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A POLICY TO PROHIBIT DRIVERS
FROM OFFERING OR SELLING FOOD OR BEVERAGES THAT ARE NOT
FACTORY-SEALED TO RIDERS AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 40-10.1-605 (7.7)(a);
(IX) PROVIDE COPIES OF THE POLICIES CREATED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2) TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND TO THE COMMISSION; AND
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

(X) PROVIDE COPIES OF THE POLICIES CREATED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2) TO EVERY DRIVER WHO PROVIDES SERVICES FOR THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY.
(b) WITHIN TEN BUSINESS DAYS AFTER AN UPDATE TO A POLICY
CREATED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2), A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE A COPY OF THE UPDATED POLICY TO THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL, THE COMMISSION, AND EVERY DRIVER WHO PROVIDES
SERVICES FOR THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY.
(c) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL MAKE EACH
POLICY CREATED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) AVAILABLE TO A
DRIVER ON THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY'S DIGITAL NETWORK
IN THE LANGUAGE THE DRIVER USES ON THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY'S DIGITAL NETWORK.
(3) (a) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL NOT COLLECT
BIOMETRIC DATA OR BIOMETRIC IDENTIFIERS FROM A DRIVER OR RIDER
WITHOUT FIRST OBTAINING THE CONSENT OF THE DRIVER OR RIDER.
(b) IF A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY COLLECTS BIOMETRIC
DATA OR BIOMETRIC IDENTIFIERS FROM A DRIVER OR RIDER, THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL COMPLY WITH SECTION
6-1-1314.
(4) (a) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL PROCESS
DATA IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE "COLORADO PRIVACY ACT", PART 13 OF
ARTICLE 1 OF TITLE 6.
(b) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT
RULES GOVERNING THE RETENTION, STORAGE, AND USE OF AND ACCESS TO
THE DATA COLLECTED BY A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY.
(c) UNTIL THE COMMISSION ADOPTS RULES GOVERNING THE
COLLECTION OF DATA PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(b) OF THIS SECTION, A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL RETAIN ALL AUDIO AND VIDEO
RECORDINGS RECEIVED FROM A PREARRANGED RIDE FOR THIRTY DAYS AFTER
THE PREARRANGED RIDE; EXCEPT THAT, IF A PERSON FILES A COMPLAINT
AGAINST A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY WITH THE COMMISSION OR
A PREARRANGED RIDE IS THE SUBJECT OF AN ACTIVE LAW ENFORCEMENT
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

INVESTIGATION, THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL RETAIN
THE AUDIO AND VIDEO RECORDING FOR ONE YEAR OR UNTIL THE
INVESTIGATION IS COMPLETED, WHICHEVER IS LONGER.
(d) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT
RULES GOVERNING A COMPLAINANT'S ACCESS TO THE DATA COLLECTED BY
A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY RELATED TO A COMPLAINT
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 40-10.1-605 (3)(c)(VI).
(5) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY THAT:
(a) EITHER SERVES RIDERS, AT LEAST SEVENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF
WHOM ARE MINORS, OR EARNS AT LEAST NINETY PERCENT OF THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY'S REVENUE FROM CONTRACTS WITH
A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE SCHOOL, THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, OR
AN AGENCY OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT OR
OF THE STATE; AND
(b) HAS AT LEAST NINETY PERCENT OF THE TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY'S DRIVERS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE COMMISSION'S
RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 40-10.1-608 (3)(a).
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-7-113, amend (1)
introductory portion and (1)(g); and add (1)(b.5) as follows:
40-7-113. Civil penalties - fines.
(1) In addition to any other penalty otherwise authorized by law and
except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, any
A person who THAT violates article 10.1 or 10.5 of this title 40 or any A rule
promulgated ADOPTED by the commission pursuant to article 10.1 or 10.5
OF THIS TITLE 40, which article or rule is applicable to the person, may be
subject to fines as specified in the following paragraphs FOLLOWS:
(b.5) (I) THE COMMISSION MAY ASSESS A CIVIL PENALTY OF NOT
MORE THAN ONE THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS PER VIOLATION
AGAINST A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY THAT VIOLATES PART 6
OF ARTICLE 10.1 OF THIS TITLE 40.
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

(II) THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER THE SIZE OF THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY WHEN ASSESSING A CIVIL PENALTY
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (1)(b.5).
(III) THE ASSESSMENT OF A CIVIL PENALTY PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (1)(b.5) DOES NOT PRECLUDE A PARTY FROM INITIATING A CIVIL
ACTION OR ANY OTHER LEGAL RECOURSE AGAINST A TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY.
(g) A person who THAT violates any A provision of article 10.1 or
10.5 of this title 40 not enumerated in subsection (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(b.5), or
(1)(e) of this section, any A rule promulgated ADOPTED by the commission
pursuant to this title 40, or any A safety rule adopted by the department of
public safety relating to motor carriers as defined in section 40-10.1-101
may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than one thousand one hundred
dollars; except that any A person who THAT violates a safety rule
promulgated ADOPTED by the commission is subject to the civil penalties
authorized pursuant to 49 CFR 386, subpart G, and associated appendices
to part 386 49 CFR 386, as the subpart existed on January 1, 2017.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-4-127, amend
(3)(b)(III); and add (3)(b)(V) and (3)(b)(VI) as follows:
8-4-127. Transportation network companies - disclosures to
drivers - deactivation and suspension policies - disclosures to division
- definitions - enforcement - rules.
(3) Deactivation and suspension policy - disclosure - rules.
(b) In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection (3)(a) of
this section, a TNC's deactivation and suspension policy must be:
(III) Made available in English, Spanish, Arabic, and up to three
additional languages commonly spoken by TNC drivers in the state, as
determined by the director by rule; and
(V) SET UP TO INCLUDE A PROCEDURE FOR INITIATING A REVIEW OF
A DRIVER FOR DEACTIVATION WITHIN SEVEN BUSINESS DAYS AFTER A
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY IS NOTIFIED THROUGH A COMPLAINT
FILED WITH THE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY OR THE PUBLIC
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

UTILITIES COMMISSION OR THROUGH CONTACT BY THE OFFICE OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL, A DISTRICT ATTORNEY'S OFFICE, OR A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY REGARDING AN ALLEGATION AGAINST THE DRIVER
OF:
(A) A FELONY OFFENSE INVOLVING FRAUD, AS DESCRIBED IN ARTICLE
5 OF TITLE 18;
(B) AN OFFENSE INVOLVING UNLAWFUL SEXUAL BEHAVIOR, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 16-22-102 (9);
(C) A FELONY OFFENSE AGAINST PROPERTY, AS DESCRIBED IN
ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 18;
(D) A FELONY CRIME OF VIOLENCE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
18-1.3-406 (2);
(E) A FELONY OFFENSE INVOLVING DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, AS DEFINED
IN SECTION 18-6-800.3 (1);
(F) A FELONY OFFENSE INVOLVING STALKING, AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 18-3-602; OR
(G) A FELONY OFFENSE INVOLVING MENACING, AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 18-3-206; AND
(VI) SET UP TO INCLUDE MEANINGFUL HUMAN REVIEW OF THE
PERMANENT DEACTIVATION OF A DRIVER CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (3)(b)(V) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 8. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) Section 40-10.1-605 (3)(b), (3)(b.5), (3)(b.7), (3)(c)(I),
(3)(c)(II), (3)(c)(V), (3)(c)(VI), (3)(e), (7.5), (7.7), and (7.8), Colorado
Revised Statutes, as amended or enacted in section 3 of this act; section
40-10.1-609, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 4 of this act;
section 40-10.1-610 (1), (2), (3), (4)(a), and (5), Colorado Revised Statutes,
as enacted in section 5 of this act; and section 40-7-113, Colorado Revised
Statutes, as amended in section 6 of this act, take effect January 1, 2027,
and the remainder of this act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

general assembly; except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to
section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item,
section, or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or
part will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general
election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on
the date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor;
except that section 40-10.1-605 (3)(b), (3)(b.5), (3)(b.7), (3)(c)(I), (3)(c)(II),
(3)(c)(V), (3)(c)(VI), (3)(e), (7.5), (7.7), and (7.8), Colorado Revised
Statutes, as amended or enacted in section 3 of this act; section 40-10.1-609,
Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 4 of this act; section
40-10.1-610 (1), (2), (3), (4)(a), and (5), Colorado Revised Statutes, as
enacted in section 5 of this act; and section 40-7-113, Colorado Revised
Statutes, as amended in section 6 of this act, take effect January 1, 2027, or
on the date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor,
whichever is later.
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 26-1424

(2) This act applies to offenses committed on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 26-1424